Maine, session 132, LD1411.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1251, sub-§1-A, as amended by PL 2001, c. 687, §14, is
further amended to read:
1-A. Residents required to obtain license. Within 30 days of becoming a resident
of this State, a person shall apply to obtain a license in accordance with section 1301.
Except as provided in section 510, subsection 1, a person who fails to comply with the
requirement of this subsection and operates a motor vehicle on a public way or parking
area commits: a traffic infraction. If the person has been a resident for at least 90 days the
penalty is a fine of not less than $150 and not more than $500.
A. A traffic infraction if the person has been a resident for less than 90 days; or
B. A Class E crime if the person has been a resident for at least 90 days.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1301, sub-§6, as repealed and replaced by PL 2005, c. 250,
§2, is amended to read:
6. Social security number. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the social
security number of any applicant for a license or nondriver identification card must be
recorded on the application, and the Secretary of State may not issue a license or nondriver
identification card to a person who does not possess and provide a valid social security
number. The Secretary of State shall collect, store and verify the social security number of
an applicant for a license or nondriver identification card and may use that number to
establish a permanent license number or nondriver identification number. This subsection
does not apply to a person who provides written proof to the Secretary of State that the
person is legally ineligible to receive a social security number.
Page 1 - 132LR1735(03)